Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1104.03
Early Childhood Education Endowment Board of Trustees; created; administrative support.

To administer the Early Childhood Education Grant Program with respect to children from birth to age three, the Early Childhood Education Endowment Board of Trustees is created. For administrative support and budgetary purposes only, the board of trustees shall be within the State Department of Education.

Laws 2006, LB 1256, § 6.